Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9404
Designation of caregiver; record; contents; effect of designation.

(1) If a patient or a patient’s legal guardian designates a caregiver, the hospital shall record in the patient’s medical record the designated caregiver’s name, his or her relationship to the patient, and the caregiver’s telephone number, residence address, and other contact information.

(2) A patient or a patient’s legal guardian may change the caregiver designation at any time. The hospital shall document the change in the patient’s medical record before the patient's discharge.

(3) A person designated as a caregiver is not obligated to accept such designation or to perform aftercare for the designating patient or patient's legal guardian.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 10.